Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB406.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5539.1. Kidnapping of animals. (a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if the person:(1) intentionally, knowingly or recklessly takes, sells or purchases any dog, cat, equine animal, swine or cattle for resale to another, use in a laboratory or for animal fighting; or(2) intentionally, knowingly or recklessly takes or carries away any dog, cat or equine animal without permission for a special or temporary purpose.123456789101112131415161718 (b) Grading.--An offense under subsection (a) shall be graded as follows:(1) An offense under subsection (a)(1) is a felony of the third degree and a second or subsequent offense under subsection (a)(1) is a felony of the second degree.(2) An offense under subsection (a)(2) is a misdemeanor of the third degree and a second or subsequent offense under subsection (a)(2) is a misdemeanor of the second degree.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0406PN0378 - 2 - 123456789